hu_hu.dict
üvegházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
ügyvezetőurak/wIóÍžĆćşx)
útlevelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
övvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
örömtüzek/IóÍžĆćşx)
önvédelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
önbizalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
őstüzek/IóÍžĆćşx)
őrházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
ócskavasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
évhetek/IóÍžĆćşx)
értelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
éléstárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
éhgyomrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
átlagárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
áruraktárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
áramvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
állóvizek/IóÍžĆćşx)
állatkölykök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
ágyútalpak/IóÍžĆćşx)
zúzottkövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
zárókövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
zsúpfedelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
zabpelyhek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
vízvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vízimadarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vívótermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
vérdíjak/IóÍžĆćşx)
védőfalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vásárterek/IóÍžĆćşx)
vándordíjak/IóÍžĆćşx)
válaszutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vonóhorgok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
vizek/IóÍžĆćşx)
visszakezek/IóÍžĆćşx)
világítótornyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
vezérművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
veszedelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
verebek/IóÍžĆćşx)
vastagbelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
vanillinsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vadszamarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
utóhadak/IóÍžĆćşx)
ujjak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tükrök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
túloldalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tökbelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
télibaglyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tárgyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tájak/IóÍžĆćşx)
trikarbonsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tonhalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tisztítótüzek/IóÍžĆćşx)
tetőtornyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
terjedelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tengerárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
teljhatalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tejárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tanítóurak/wIóÍžĆćşx)
tantárgyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
süteményestálak/IóÍžĆćşx)
sósrudak/IóÍžĆćşx)
sírkövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
sárlevek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szökőárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szójakenyerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
színterek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szénásszekerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szélmalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szárnyfedelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szánalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szutykok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szorgalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szitkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szidalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szerelőlyukak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szenteltvizek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szemetek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szarvasbogarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szabadalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
sorházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
sejtelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
rőzsekosarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
rádiócsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
repülőutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
rakterek/IóÍžĆćşx)
pöckök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
pénztárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
puskatüzek/IóÍžĆćşx)
polgármesterurak/wIóÍžĆćşx)
pipaszutykok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
pecsenyéstálak/IóÍžĆćşx)
osztályvezetőurak/wIóÍžĆćşx)
operaházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
oktadecénsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
nyúlfarkfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
nyirokerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
nukleinsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
nagyágyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
nagydíjak/IóÍžĆćşx)
műlegyek/IóÍžĆćşx)
mézek/IóÍžĆćşx)
mászóvasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
mosogatóvizek/IóÍžĆćşx)
meteorkövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
menlevelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
megbízólevelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
magánlevelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
lúdtalpak/IóÍžĆćşx)
légzőgyökerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
lámpalázak/IóÍžĆćşx)
linolénsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
lendítőkerekek/IóÍžĆćşx)
küzdőterek/IóÍžĆćşx)
közraktárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
körutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kölkök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
kőházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kézitükrök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
kémcsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kurtavasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
krotonsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
komiszkenyerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kisvasutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kishalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kifolyócsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kerekek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kefehajak/IóÍžĆćşx)
karboxilsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kantárszárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
jégárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
jobbszárnyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
izomburkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
inozinsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
igásbarmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
hőcsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
házipénztárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
hálótermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
honfitársak/IóÍžĆćşx)
hidegházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
hegyoldalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
harántvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
halmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
hajszálak/IóÍžĆćşx)
görögtüzek/IóÍžĆćşx)
gázművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
gyötrelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
gyorséttermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
gyaluvasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
gemkapcsok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
fűtőházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
főutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
főgyökerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
félutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
fumársavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
folyóágak/IóÍžĆćşx)
fodrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
felvonóhidak/IóÍžĆćşx)
feketeforgalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
faágak/IóÍžĆćşx)
falkapcsok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
etándisavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
emlékművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
elektroncsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
dörzskerekek/IóÍžĆćşx)
dréncsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
dicsvágyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
címszavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
csónakházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
csigakerekek/IóÍžĆćşx)
csapágyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
cimbalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
búvólyukak/IóÍžĆćşx)
békakövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
bukómadarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
boltvállak/IóÍžĆćşx)
bibeszárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
belkereskedelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
bankjegyforgalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
bajszok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
aranyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
almok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
alagutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
aggófüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
Mórahalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
